Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 2671.
Applications.

Any person who desires to be licensed under this chapter shall submit an application as specified by the Director, accompanied by payment of the required fee. An applicant shall submit satisfactory proof that he or she meets the qualifications under section 2672 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 60;

2005, No. 27

, § 77;

2019, No. 30

, § 17.

§ 2672.
Qualifications.

A person shall not be licensed under this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, unless he or she has obtained a high school education or its equivalent and:

Education. Has completed:

at least a two-year course of study in a school of ophthalmic dispensing approved by the Director or a school that is a candidate for accreditation by an accreditation agency approved by the U.S. Department of Education and by the Director;

at least two years of practical training and experience, approved by the Director, under the supervision of a licensed optician, ophthalmologist, or optometrist; or

the National Academy of Opticianry Ophthalmic Career Progression Program, including at least one year of practical training and experience, approved by the Director, under the supervision of a licensed optician, ophthalmologist, or optometrist; and

Examination. Has passed an examination recognized by the Director that shall include assessment of competency in ophthalmic materials; laboratory, practical, and physiological optics; prescription interpretation; dispensing preparation; adjustment of lenses, spectacles, eyeglasses, prisms, tinted lenses, and appurtenances; the use of lensometers or equivalent instruments; adjusting instruments; and pupillary and facial measurements.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2005, No. 27

, § 78;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2019, No. 30

, § 17.

§ 2673.
Repealed. 2019, No. 30, § 17.

§ 2674.
Optician trainee; registration.

Any person entering into employment for the purpose of obtaining practical experience and skill as a licensed optician shall register as an optician trainee with the Office within 60 days of entering the employment. The computation of any period of training shall commence at the date of the registration.

The application for registration shall be certified by the employer and by the applicant and accompanied by an application fee. The Office may issue to the applicant an optician trainee’s certificate. Every registered optician trainee who continues to act as an optician trainee shall, biennially, renew his or her optician trainee’s certificate of registration by paying a renewal fee.

No optician may have more than two optician trainees under his or her supervision during any given period of time, nor shall any establishment employ more than two optician trainees for every full-time optician in its employment. An optician trainee must be under direct personal supervision of an optician, optometrist, or ophthalmologist. A supervisor shall provide direct personal supervision of an optician trainee, while the optician trainee is working, by being physically present for consultation or intervention on the premises where the trainee is working. Merely being available at another optical facility for consultation does not constitute direct personal supervision.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 61;

1993, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2005, No. 27

, § 79;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 30.

§ 2675.
Examinations not required.

Licenses shall be issued without examination on application and upon payment of the required fee to an applicant who is an optician currently licensed in another state, territory, country, or province provided the requirements for the regulation or licensing of opticians in the other state, territory, country, or province are substantially equal to the requirements in force in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1975, No. 111

, § 3;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 62;

1993, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2676.
License; renewal; reinstatement.

A license issued under this chapter shall be valid for a period of two years. A person may renew the license biennially by payment of the renewal fee to the Office.

Any person whose license expired, provided the period of expiration has been less than five years, may reinstate that license by paying the renewal fee plus the late renewal penalty.

Licenses that have lapsed for more than five years may be reinstated by:

demonstrating more than 1,000 hours’ licensed practice in another state over the preceding two years; or

successfully completing the national licensing examination within one year prior to applying for reinstatement; and

paying of the renewal fee and late renewal penalty.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1975, No. 111

, § 4;

1983, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 63;

2005, No. 27

, § 80;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 29.

§ 2677.
Revocation; suspension and refusing of renewal of license.

The Director may, in his or her discretion, refuse to issue, suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew a license when the applicant or licensee engages in any of the following conduct or the conduct set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 129a

:

is guilty, upon the finding of a court of competent jurisdiction, of violating the provisions of this chapter;

is incompetent to practice, by reason of addiction to alcohol, narcotics, or other habit-forming drugs;

is guilty of fraud or deceit in practice as an optician;

violates, induces others to violate, or cooperates with others in violating any of the rules and regulations of the profession;

advertises in any manner that would tend to deceive or mislead the public, or engages in any form of house-to-house canvassing or soliciting for the sale of eyeglasses or other ophthalmic materials or services;

participates in the division, assignment, rebate, or refund of fees or parts thereof in connection referrals from the prescriber; or

originates, issues, alters, or changes in any way any optical prescription, or practices ocular refraction, orthoptics, or visual training, or offers to do so.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1997, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 48;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§§ 2678,
2679.
Repealed. 2005, No. 27, § 117(1).

§ 2680.
Repealed. 1997, No. 59, § 65(2), eff. June 30, 1997.

§ 2681.
Repealed. 2005, No. 148 (Adj. Sess.), § 54.